Washington statutes.
RCW 18.33.020

State participation in the compact.

(1) In order to join the compact and thereafter continue as a participating state, a state must:

(a) Enact a compact that is not materially different from the model compact as determined in accordance with commission rules;

(b) Participate fully in the commission's data system;

(c) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about its licensees and license applicants;

(d) Notify the commission, in compliance with the terms of the compact and commission rules, of any adverse action or the availability of significant investigative information regarding a licensee and license applicant;

(e) Fully implement a criminal background check requirement, within a time frame established by commission rule, by receiving the results of a qualifying criminal background check;

(f) Comply with the commission rules applicable to a participating state;

(g) Accept the national board examinations of the joint commission on national dental examinations or another examination accepted by commission rule as a licensure examination;

(h) Accept for licensure that applicants for a dentist license graduate from a predoctoral dental education program accredited by the commission on dental accreditation or another accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading to the doctor of dental surgery or doctor of dental medicine degree;

(i) Accept for licensure that applicants for a dental hygienist license graduate from a dental hygiene education program accredited by the commission on dental accreditation or another accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;

(j) Require for licensure that applicants successfully complete a clinical assessment;

(k) Have continuing professional development requirements as a condition for license renewal; and

(l) Pay a participation fee to the commission as established by commission rule.

(2) Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an unrestricted license does not disqualify a state from participating in the compact.

(3) When conducting a criminal background check the state licensing authority shall:

(a) Consider that information in making a licensure decision;

(b) Maintain documentation of completion of the criminal background check and background check information to the extent allowed by state and federal law; and

(c) Report to the commission whether it has completed the criminal background check and whether the individual was granted or denied a license.

(4) A licensee of a participating state who has a qualifying license in that state and does not hold an encumbered license in any other participating state shall be issued a compact privilege in a remote state in accordance with the terms of the compact and commission rules. If a remote state has a jurisprudence requirement a compact privilege will not be issued to the licensee unless the licensee has satisfied the jurisprudence requirement.

[ 2023 c 297 s 3.]